Dictionaries/dictionaries-master/sr/sr-Latn.aff
FLAG num
SFX 453 Y 8
SFX 453 ka ka
SFX 453 ka ke
SFX 453 ka koj
SFX 453 ka ku
SFX 453 ka ko
SFX 453 ka kom
SFX 453 ka ke
SFX 453 ka kama

SFX 454 Y 7
SFX 454 anj anj
SFX 454 anj nja
SFX 454 anj nju
SFX 454 anj nje
SFX 454 anj njem
SFX 454 anj si
SFX 454 anj sima

SFX 455 Y 4
SFX 455 i i
SFX 455 i eg
SFX 455 i em
SFX 455 i im

SFX 456 Y 7
SFX 456 h h
SFX 456 h ha
SFX 456 h hu
SFX 456 h še
SFX 456 h hom
SFX 456 h si
SFX 456 h sima

SFX 457 Y 4
SFX 457 ci ci
SFX 457 ci ka
SFX 457 ci ke
SFX 457 ci cima

SFX 458 Y 1
SFX 458 e e

SFX 459 Y 4
SFX 459 i i
SFX 459 i a
SFX 459 i e
SFX 459 i ima

SFX 460 Y 3
SFX 460 e e
SFX 460 e a
SFX 460 e ima

SFX 461 Y 7
SFX 461 ć ć
SFX 461 ć ća
SFX 461 ć ću
SFX 461 ć će
SFX 461 ć ćom
SFX 461 ć ći
SFX 461 ć ćima

SFX 462 Y 7
SFX 462 č č
SFX 462 č ča
SFX 462 č ču
SFX 462 č čom
SFX 462 č či
SFX 462 č čima
SFX 462 č če

SFX 463 Y 1
SFX 463 o o

SFX 464 Y 6
SFX 464 o o
SFX 464 o a
SFX 464 o u
SFX 464 o om
SFX 464 o ama
SFX 464 o e

SFX 465 Y 5
SFX 465 nj nj
SFX 465 nj nja
SFX 465 nj nju
SFX 465 nj nje
SFX 465 nj njom

SFX 466 Y 9
SFX 466 š š
SFX 466 š ša
SFX 466 š šu
SFX 466 š še
SFX 466 š šem
SFX 466 š šovi
SFX 466 š šova
SFX 466 š šovima
SFX 466 š šove

SFX 467 Y 5
SFX 467 o o
SFX 467 o e
SFX 467 o o
SFX 467 o u
SFX 467 o om

SFX 468 Y 4
SFX 468 e e
SFX 468 e a
SFX 468 e u
SFX 468 e ima

SFX 469 Y 3
SFX 469 e a
SFX 469 e e
SFX 469 e ama

SFX 470 Y 8
SFX 470 n n
SFX 470 n na
SFX 470 n nu
SFX 470 n nom
SFX 470 n novi
SFX 470 n nova
SFX 470 n novima
SFX 470 n nove

SFX 471 Y 4
SFX 471 de de
SFX 471 de deta
SFX 471 de detu
SFX 471 de detom

SFX 472 Y 8
SFX 472 d d
SFX 472 d du
SFX 472 d da
SFX 472 d dom
SFX 472 d dovi
SFX 472 d dova
SFX 472 d dovima
SFX 472 d dove

SFX 473 Y 8
SFX 473 d d
SFX 473 d da
SFX 473 d du
SFX 473 d de
SFX 473 d dom
SFX 473 d di
SFX 473 d da
SFX 473 d dima

SFX 474 Y 9
SFX 474 č č
SFX 474 č ča
SFX 474 č ču
SFX 474 č če
SFX 474 č čom
SFX 474 č čovi
SFX 474 č čova
SFX 474 č čovima
SFX 474 č čove

SFX 475 Y 9
SFX 475 š š
SFX 475 š ša
SFX 475 š šu
SFX 475 š še
SFX 475 š šom
SFX 475 š šovi
SFX 475 š šova
SFX 475 š šovima
SFX 475 š šove

SFX 476 Y 4
SFX 476 ljo ljo
SFX 476 ljo lja
SFX 476 ljo lju
SFX 476 ljo ljom

SFX 477 Y 9
SFX 477 t n
SFX 477 t na
SFX 477 t nu
SFX 477 t ne
SFX 477 t nom
SFX 477 t novi
SFX 477 t nova
SFX 477 t novima
SFX 477 t nove

SFX 478 Y 7
SFX 478 g g
SFX 478 g ga
SFX 478 g gu
SFX 478 g že
SFX 478 g gom
SFX 478 g zi
SFX 478 g zima

SFX 479 Y 7
SFX 479 o o
SFX 479 o a
SFX 479 o u
SFX 479 o om
SFX 479 o i
SFX 479 o ama
SFX 479 o e

SFX 480 Y 4
SFX 480 si s
SFX 480 si ha
SFX 480 si sima
SFX 480 si he

SFX 481 Y 8
SFX 481 ć ć
SFX 481 ć ća
SFX 481 ć ću
SFX 481 ć ćem
SFX 481 ć ćevi
SFX 481 ć ćeva
SFX 481 ć ćevima
SFX 481 ć ćeve

SFX 482 Y 3
SFX 482 ce e
SFX 482 ce a
SFX 482 ce ama

SFX 483 Y 4
SFX 483 o o
SFX 483 o og
SFX 483 o om
SFX 483 o im

SFX 484 Y 8
SFX 484 s s
SFX 484 s sa
SFX 484 s su
SFX 484 s se
SFX 484 s sovi
SFX 484 s sova
SFX 484 s sovima
SFX 484 s sove

SFX 485 Y 6
SFX 485 a a
SFX 485 a e
SFX 485 a i
SFX 485 a u
SFX 485 a om
SFX 485 a ama

SFX 486 Y 6
SFX 486 i i
SFX 486 i ija
SFX 486 i iju
SFX 486 i ijem
SFX 486 i ije
SFX 486 i ijima

SFX 487 Y 8
SFX 487 s s
SFX 487 s sa
SFX 487 s su
SFX 487 s som
SFX 487 s si
SFX 487 s sa
SFX 487 s sima
SFX 487 s se

SFX 488 Y 4
SFX 488 c c
SFX 488 c ca
SFX 488 c cu
SFX 488 c com

SFX 489 Y 4
SFX 489 ce e
SFX 489 ce eta
SFX 489 ce etu
SFX 489 ce etom

SFX 490 Y 5
SFX 490 š š
SFX 490 š ša
SFX 490 š šu
SFX 490 š še
SFX 490 š šom

SFX 491 Y 5
SFX 491 k k
SFX 491 k ka
SFX 491 k ku
SFX 491 k ke
SFX 491 k kom

SFX 492 Y 3
SFX 492 ke ke
SFX 492 ke ka
SFX 492 ke cima

SFX 493 Y 4
SFX 493 đ đ
SFX 493 đ đa
SFX 493 đ đu
SFX 493 đ đem

SFX 494 Y 1
SFX 494 n n

SFX 495 Y 5
SFX 495 o o
SFX 495 o oa
SFX 495 o ou
SFX 495 o oe
SFX 495 o oom

SFX 496 Y 6
SFX 496 ka ka
SFX 496 ka kih
SFX 496 ka kim
SFX 496 ka ko
SFX 496 ka kog
SFX 496 ka kom

SFX 497 Y 5
SFX 497 e e
SFX 497 e i
SFX 497 e u
SFX 497 e a
SFX 497 e ama

SFX 498 Y 4
SFX 498 e e
SFX 498 e a
SFX 498 e ama
SFX 498 e i

SFX 499 Y 7
SFX 499 ce e
SFX 499 ce ea
SFX 499 ce eu
SFX 499 ce eom
SFX 499 ce ei
SFX 499 ce eima
SFX 499 ce ee

SFX 500 Y 8
SFX 500 n n
SFX 500 n na
SFX 500 n nu
SFX 500 n nom
SFX 500 n nevi
SFX 500 n neva
SFX 500 n nevima
SFX 500 n neve

SFX 501 Y 7
SFX 501 nj nj
SFX 501 nj nja
SFX 501 nj nju
SFX 501 nj nje
SFX 501 nj njom
SFX 501 nj nji
SFX 501 nj njima

SFX 502 Y 1
SFX 502 m m

SFX 503 Y 9
SFX 503 š š
SFX 503 š ša
SFX 503 š šu
SFX 503 š še
SFX 503 š šom
SFX 503 š ševi
SFX 503 š ševa
SFX 503 š ševiša
SFX 503 š ševe

SFX 504 Y 7
SFX 504 u u
SFX 504 u ua
SFX 504 u uu
SFX 504 u uom
SFX 504 u uovi
SFX 504 u uovima
SFX 504 u uove

SFX 505 Y 4
SFX 505 oci oci
SFX 505 oci laca
SFX 505 oci ocima
SFX 505 oci oce

SFX 506 Y 8
SFX 506 š š
SFX 506 š ša
SFX 506 š šu
SFX 506 š šem
SFX 506 š ševi
SFX 506 š ševa
SFX 506 š ševima
SFX 506 š ševe

SFX 507 Y 9
SFX 507 lj lj
SFX 507 lj lja
SFX 507 lj lju
SFX 507 lj lje
SFX 507 lj ljom
SFX 507 lj ljovi
SFX 507 lj ljova
SFX 507 lj ljovima
SFX 507 lj ljove

SFX 508 Y 4
SFX 508 te e
SFX 508 te eta
SFX 508 te etu
SFX 508 te etom

SFX 509 Y 6
SFX 509 o o
SFX 509 o oa
SFX 509 o ou
SFX 509 o oe
SFX 509 o oom
SFX 509 o oima

SFX 510 Y 5
SFX 510 e e
SFX 510 e ea
SFX 510 e eu
SFX 510 e eom
SFX 510 e eima

SFX 511 Y 7
SFX 511 n n
SFX 511 n na
SFX 511 n nu
SFX 511 n nom
SFX 511 n ni
SFX 511 n nima
SFX 511 n ne

SFX 512 Y 8
SFX 512 ak k
SFX 512 ak ka
SFX 512 ak ku
SFX 512 ak kom
SFX 512 ak kovi
SFX 512 ak kova
SFX 512 ak kovima
SFX 512 ak kove

SFX 513 Y 4
SFX 513 be e
SFX 513 be eta
SFX 513 be etu
SFX 513 be etom

SFX 514 Y 5
SFX 514 n n
SFX 514 n na
SFX 514 n nu
SFX 514 n ne
SFX 514 n nom

SFX 515 Y 1
SFX 515 dž dž

SFX 516 Y 4
SFX 516 ci ci
SFX 516 ci taka
SFX 516 ci ke
SFX 516 ci cima

SFX 517 Y 4
SFX 517 lji lji
SFX 517 lji lja
SFX 517 lji ljima
SFX 517 lji lje

SFX 518 Y 7
SFX 518 i i
SFX 518 i og
SFX 518 i om
SFX 518 i im
SFX 518 i ima
SFX 518 i ih
SFX 518 i e

SFX 519 Y 4
SFX 519 ci ci
SFX 519 ci taca
SFX 519 ci čeve
SFX 519 ci cima

SFX 520 Y 8
SFX 520 l l
SFX 520 l la
SFX 520 l lu
SFX 520 l le
SFX 520 l lom
SFX 520 l li
SFX 520 l lima
SFX 520 l le

SFX 521 Y 8
SFX 521 ž ž
SFX 521 ž ža
SFX 521 ž žu
SFX 521 ž že
SFX 521 ž žem
SFX 521 ž ži
SFX 521 ž žima
SFX 521 ž že

SFX 522 Y 3
SFX 522 i a
SFX 522 i e
SFX 522 i ima

SFX 523 Y 3
SFX 523 ž i
SFX 523 ž e
SFX 523 ž ima

SFX 524 Y 9
SFX 524 č č
SFX 524 č ča
SFX 524 č ču
SFX 524 č če
SFX 524 č čom
SFX 524 č čevi
SFX 524 č čeva
SFX 524 č čevima
SFX 524 č čeve

SFX 525 Y 6
SFX 525 o o
SFX 525 o a
SFX 525 o u
SFX 525 o i
SFX 525 o ima
SFX 525 o e

SFX 526 Y 7
SFX 526 c c
SFX 526 c ca
SFX 526 c cu
SFX 526 c ce
SFX 526 c com
SFX 526 c ci
SFX 526 c covima

SFX 527 Y 9
SFX 527 nj nj
SFX 527 nj nja
SFX 527 nj nju
SFX 527 nj nje
SFX 527 nj njom
SFX 527 nj njevi
SFX 527 nj njeva
SFX 527 nj njevima
SFX 527 nj njeve

SFX 528 Y 8
SFX 528 nj nj
SFX 528 nj nja
SFX 528 nj nju
SFX 528 nj nje
SFX 528 nj njevi
SFX 528 nj njeva
SFX 528 nj njevima
SFX 528 nj njeve

SFX 529 Y 4
SFX 529 se e
SFX 529 se eta
SFX 529 se etu
SFX 529 se etom

SFX 530 Y 4
SFX 530 lji lji
SFX 530 lji alja
SFX 530 lji ljima
SFX 530 lji lje

SFX 531 Y 4
SFX 531 e e
SFX 531 e a
SFX 531 e u
SFX 531 e ama

SFX 532 Y 4
SFX 532 me e
SFX 532 me eta
SFX 532 me etu
SFX 532 me etom

SFX 533 Y 4
SFX 533 ci ci
SFX 533 ci aka
SFX 533 ci ke
SFX 533 ci cima

SFX 534 Y 9
SFX 534 b b
SFX 534 b ba
SFX 534 b bu
SFX 534 b be
SFX 534 b bom
SFX 534 b bovi
SFX 534 b bova
SFX 534 b bovima
SFX 534 b bovr

SFX 535 Y 9
SFX 535 š dž
SFX 535 š dža
SFX 535 š džu
SFX 535 š dže
SFX 535 š džom
SFX 535 š dževi
SFX 535 š dževa
SFX 535 š dževima
SFX 535 š dževe

SFX 536 Y 5
SFX 536 o o
SFX 536 o a
SFX 536 o u
SFX 536 o e
SFX 536 o ama

SFX 537 Y 16
SFX 537 n nac
SFX 537 n nca
SFX 537 n ncu
SFX 537 n nče
SFX 537 n ncem
SFX 537 n nci
SFX 537 n naca
SFX 537 n ncima
SFX 537 n nce
SFX 537 n nka
SFX 537 n nke
SFX 537 n nki
SFX 537 n nku
SFX 537 n nko
SFX 537 n nkom
SFX 537 n nkama
